California, session 20252026, AB2128.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 34336 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:34336. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Covered housing” means a federal housing program administered by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A) Project-based rental assistance (42 U.S.C. 1437f).(B) Public housing under Section 9 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437g).(C) Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (24 U.S.C. 1437 et seq.), including special purpose vouchers, such as Mainstream Vouchers, Stability Vouchers, the Housing Choice Voucher Homeownership Program, Veteran’s Affairs Supportive Housing Vouchers, the Family Unification Program, the Foster Youth to Independence Program, or any other programs established by Section 8 in a federal register notice.(2) “Covered housing provider” means an authority, private owner, property manager, or other entity that administers or is subsidized to provide housing through a covered housing program.(3) “Term limits” means any limitation on the duration of time within which an individual may live in covered housing.(4) “Work requirements” means any requirements to complete work activities, such as working, pursuing education, participating in a work or job training program, volunteering, or doing community service. Work activities include include, but are not limited to to, work activities defined in subsection (d) of Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(b) Unless required by federal law, a covered housing provider shall not establish or implement any rules, policies, or procedures that impose either of the following as a condition of initial or continued eligibility for any covered housing or that impact the amount of the rent subsidy or assistance provided to covered housing tenants:(1) Term limits.(2) Work requirements.(c) A covered housing provider may establish or implement a voluntary employment or job training program if both of the following apply:(1) Participation does not impact the applicant’s or tenant’s initial or continued eligibility for the rent subsidy or assistance or the amount of rent subsidy or assistance.(2) The voluntary employment or job training program has one or more of the following goals for participants:(A) Increasing personal income.(B) Generating financial savings.(C) Home ownership.(D) Increasing financial well-being and creditworthiness.(E) Increasing educational attainment.(F) Acquiring job skills.(G) Expanding employment options.(d) Subdivision (b) does not apply to an authority participating in the Moving to Work demonstration (Public Law 104-134, 110 Stat. 1321, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f) that has work requirements or time limits that comply with regulations established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.(e) This section does not limit or alter the operation of the Family Self-Sufficiency program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437u) or the Public Housing Community Service requirement (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437j).